District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0514.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Modification Nos. M04, M05, and M06 to Contract No. DCAM-23-NC-
RFP-0007 with AAA Complete Building Services, Inc., Approval and Payment Authorization
Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the
requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02), the Council approves Modification
Nos. M04 and M05 and proposed Modification No. M06 to Contract No. DCAM-23-NC-RFP-
0007 with AAA Complete Building Services, Inc., and authorizes payment in the not-to-exceed
amount of $2,736,751.60 for the goods and services received and to be received under the
contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4(a) of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47(a)).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
1

90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2